District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.08

Change of name, address, type of entity, or jurisdiction of formation by noncommercial registered agent.

(a)

If a noncommercial registered agent changes its name, its address in effect with respect to a represented entity under § 29-104.04(a), its type of entity, or its jurisdiction of formation, the agent shall deliver to the Mayor for filing, with respect to each entity represented by the agent, a statement of change signed by the agent which states:

(1)

The name of the entity;

(2)

The name and address of the agent in effect with respect to the entity;

(3)

If the name of the agent has changed, the new name;

(4)

If the address of the agent has changed, the new address; and

(5)

If the agent is an entity:

(A)

If the type of entity has changed, the new type of entity; and

(B)

If the jurisdiction of formation has changed, the new jurisdiction of formation.

(b)

A noncommercial registered agent promptly shall furnish the represented entity with notice in a record of the delivery to the Mayor for filing of a statement of change and the changes made in the statement.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(22), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-102.11.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.